Illinois, session 104th, HB2982.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the One Fair Wage 5with Tips on Top Act. 6    Section 5. The Minimum Wage Law is amended by changing 7Sections 4, 9, and 11 as follows: 8    (820 ILCS 105/4)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1004)9    Sec. 4. (a)(1) Every employer shall pay to each of his 10employees in every occupation wages of not less than $2.30 per 11hour or in the case of employees under 18 years of age wages of 12not less than $1.95 per hour, except as provided in Sections 5 13and 6 of this Act, and on and after January 1, 1984, every 14employer shall pay to each of his employees in every 15occupation wages of not less than $2.65 per hour or in the case 16of employees under 18 years of age wages of not less than $2.25 17per hour, and on and after October 1, 1984 every employer shall 18pay to each of his employees in every occupation wages of not 19less than $3.00 per hour or in the case of employees under 18 20years of age wages of not less than $2.55 per hour, and on or 21after July 1, 1985 every employer shall pay to each of his 22employees in every occupation wages of not less than $3.35 per   HB2982- 2 -LRB104 08468 SPS 18520 b1hour or in the case of employees under 18 years of age wages of 2not less than $2.85 per hour, and from January 1, 2004 through 3December 31, 2004 every employer shall pay to each of his or 4her employees who is 18 years of age or older in every 5occupation wages of not less than $5.50 per hour, and from 6January 1, 2005 through June 30, 2007 every employer shall pay 7to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or older 8in every occupation wages of not less than $6.50 per hour, and 9from July 1, 2007 through June 30, 2008 every employer shall 10pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or 11older in every occupation wages of not less than $7.50 per 12hour, and from July 1, 2008 through June 30, 2009 every 13employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 14years of age or older in every occupation wages of not less 15than $7.75 per hour, and from July 1, 2009 through June 30, 162010 every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees 17who is 18 years of age or older in every occupation wages of 18not less than $8.00 per hour, and from July 1, 2010 through 19December 31, 2019 every employer shall pay to each of his or 20her employees who is 18 years of age or older in every 21occupation wages of not less than $8.25 per hour, and from 22January 1, 2020 through June 30, 2020, every employer shall 23pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or 24older in every occupation wages of not less than $9.25 per 25hour, and from July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020 every 26employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who is 18   HB2982- 3 -LRB104 08468 SPS 18520 b1years of age or older in every occupation wages of not less 2than $10 per hour, and from January 1, 2021 through December 331, 2021 every employer shall pay to each of his or her 4employees who is 18 years of age or older in every occupation 5wages of not less than $11 per hour, and from January 1, 2022 6through December 31, 2022 every employer shall pay to each of 7his or her employees who is 18 years of age or older in every 8occupation wages of not less than $12 per hour, and from 9January 1, 2023 through December 31, 2023 every employer shall 10pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 years of age or 11older in every occupation wages of not less than $13 per hour, 12and from January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2024, every 13employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 14years of age or older in every occupation wages of not less 15than $14 per hour; and on and after January 1, 2025, every 16employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who is 18 17years of age or older in every occupation wages of not less 18than $15 per hour.19    (2) Unless an employee's wages are reduced under Section 206, then in lieu of the rate prescribed in item (1) of this 21subsection (a), an employer may pay an employee who is 18 years 22of age or older, during the first 90 consecutive calendar days 23after the employee is initially employed by the employer, a 24wage that is not more than 50¢ less than the wage prescribed in 25item (1) of this subsection (a); however, an employer shall 26pay not less than the rate prescribed in item (1) of this   HB2982- 4 -LRB104 08468 SPS 18520 b1subsection (a) to:2        (A) a day or temporary laborer, as defined in Section 3    5 of the Day and Temporary Labor Services Act, who is 18 4    years of age or older; and5        (B) an employee who is 18 years of age or older and 6    whose employment is occasional or irregular and requires 7    not more than 90 days to complete. 8    (3) At no time on or before December 31, 2019 shall the 9wages paid to any employee under 18 years of age be more than 1050¢ less than the wage required to be paid to employees who are 11at least 18 years of age under item (1) of this subsection (a). 12Beginning on January 1, 2020, every employer shall pay to each 13of his or her employees who is under 18 years of age that has 14worked more than 650 hours for the employer during any 15calendar year a wage not less than the wage required for 16employees who are 18 years of age or older under paragraph (1) 17of subsection (a) of Section 4 of this Act. Every employer 18shall pay to each of his or her employees who is under 18 years 19of age that has not worked more than 650 hours for the employer 20during any calendar year: (1) $8 per hour from January 1, 2020 21through December 31, 2020; (2) $8.50 per hour from January 1, 222021 through December 31, 2021; (3) $9.25 per hour from 23January 1, 2022 through December 31, 2022; (4) $10.50 per hour 24from January 1, 2023 through December 31, 2023; (5) $12 per 25hour from January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2024; and (6) 26$13 per hour on and after January 1, 2025.   HB2982- 5 -LRB104 08468 SPS 18520 b1    (b) No employer shall discriminate between employees on 2the basis of sex or mental or physical disability, except as 3otherwise provided in this Act by paying wages to employees at 4a rate less than the rate at which he pays wages to employees 5for the same or substantially similar work on jobs the 6performance of which requires equal skill, effort, and 7responsibility, and which are performed under similar working 8conditions, except where such payment is made pursuant to (1) 9a seniority system; (2) a merit system; (3) a system which 10measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; or (4) 11a differential based on any other factor other than sex or 12mental or physical disability, except as otherwise provided in 13this Act.14    (c) Every employer of an employee engaged in an occupation 15in which gratuities have customarily and usually constituted 16and have been recognized as part of the remuneration for hire 17purposes is entitled to an allowance for gratuities as part of 18the hourly wage rate provided in Section 4, subsection (a) in 19an amount as follows: not to exceed 40% of the applicable 20minimum wage rate through June 30, 2025; not to exceed 20% of 21the applicable minimum wage rate from July 1, 2025 through 22June 30, 2026; and not to exceed 10% of the applicable minimum 23wage rate from July 1, 2026 through June 30, 2027. On and after 24July 1, 2027, an employer shall not be entitled to an allowance 25for gratuities and shall pay each employee no less than the 26applicable minimum wage rate, including any minimum wage rate   HB2982- 6 -LRB104 08468 SPS 18520 b1established by a municipality that is higher than the minimum 2wage rate provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (a). The 3Director shall require each employer desiring an allowance for 4gratuities to provide substantial evidence that the amount 5claimed, which may not exceed a percentage of 40% of the 6applicable minimum wage rate as provided in this Section, was 7received by the employee in the period for which the claim of 8exemption is made, and no part thereof was returned to the 9employer, and that the employer provides, at the time of 10payment, a written accounting of the hourly wages paid for 11each shift worked during the pay period. An employer shall not 12keep any gratuities received by an employee for any purpose or 13allow a manager or a supervisor to keep any portion of an 14employee's gratuities, regardless of whether or not the 15employer takes an allowance for gratuities. Nothing in this 16Section shall be construed to prohibit an otherwise valid 17pooling of gratuities among non-managerial and non-supervisory 18employees.19    (d) No camp counselor who resides on the premises of a 20seasonal camp of an organized not-for-profit corporation shall 21be subject to the adult minimum wage if the camp counselor (1) 22works 40 or more hours per week, and (2) receives a total 23weekly salary of not less than the adult minimum wage for a 2440-hour week. If the counselor works less than 40 hours per 25week, the counselor shall be paid the minimum hourly wage for 26each hour worked. Every employer of a camp counselor under   HB2982- 7 -LRB104 08468 SPS 18520 b1this subsection is entitled to an allowance for meals and 2lodging as part of the hourly wage rate provided in Section 4, 3subsection (a), in an amount not to exceed 25% of the minimum 4wage rate.5    (e) A camp counselor employed at a day camp is not subject 6to the adult minimum wage if the camp counselor is paid a 7stipend on a onetime or periodic basis and, if the camp 8counselor is a minor, the minor's parent, guardian or other 9custodian has consented in writing to the terms of payment 10before the commencement of such employment.11(Source: P.A. 101-1, eff. 2-19-19.) 12    (820 ILCS 105/9)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1009)13    Sec. 9. (a) Every employer subject to any provision of 14this Act or of any regulations issued under this Act shall keep 15a summary of this Act approved by the Director, and copies of 16any applicable regulations issued under this Act or a summary 17of such regulations, posted in a conspicuous and accessible 18place in or about the premises wherever any person subject to 19this Act is employed. Every employer subject to any provision 20of this Act or any regulations issued under this Act with 21employees who do not regularly report to a physical workplace, 22such as employees who work remotely or travel for work, shall 23also provide the summaries and regulations by email to its 24employees or conspicuous posting on the employer's website or 25intranet site, if such site is regularly used by the employer   HB2982- 8 -LRB104 08468 SPS 18520 b1to communicate work-related information to employees and is 2able to be regularly accessed by all employees, freely and 3without interference. Employers shall be furnished copies of 4such summaries and regulations by the State on request without 5charge.6    (b) Every employer shall provide each employee who 7receives gratuities, in writing in English and in the language 8identified by each employee as the primary language of the 9employee, at the time of hiring and at any time the employee's 10compensation changes, a notice containing:11        (1) the rate or rates of pay and basis thereof, 12    whether paid by the hour, shift, day, week, salary, or 13    other method, including overtime compensation rates for 14    non-exempt employees and allowances claimed as part of the 15    minimum wage, including gratuities;16        (2) employees' rights to be compensated by their 17    employer at the rate prescribed in subsection (a) of 18    Section 4 when gratuities do not bring the employee to 19    that rate at the end of each shift;20        (3) employee rights to retain gratuities as described 21    in this Act; and22        (4) other relevant employee rights deemed necessary by 23    the Director by rule.24    The Director shall prepare templates that comply with the 25notice requirements of this subsection. The template shall 26include the information required by this subsection in 2   HB2982- 9 -LRB104 08468 SPS 18520 b1languages, including English and one additional language 2determined by the Director based on the population of this 3State that speaks the language and any other factor that the 4Director deems relevant.5(Source: P.A. 103-201, eff. 1-1-24.) 6    (820 ILCS 105/11)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1011)7    Sec. 11. (a) Any employer or his agent, or the officer or 8agent of any private employer who:9        (1) hinders or delays the Director or his authorized 10    representative in the performance of his duties in the 11    enforcement of this Act; or12        (2) refuses to admit the Director or his authorized 13    representative to any place of employment; or14        (3) fails to keep the records required under this Act 15    or to furnish such records required or any information to 16    be furnished under this Act to the Director or his 17    authorized representative upon request; or18        (4) fails to make and preserve any records as required 19    hereunder; or20        (5) falsifies any such record; or21        (6) refuses to make such records available to the 22    Director or his authorized representative; or23        (7) refuses to furnish a sworn statement of such 24    records or any other information required for the proper 25    enforcement of this Act; or  HB2982- 10 -LRB104 08468 SPS 18520 b1        (8) fails to post a summary of this Act or a copy of 2    any applicable regulation as required by Section 9 of this 3    Act; 4shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; and each day of such 5failure to keep the records required under this Act or to 6furnish such records or information to the Director or his 7authorized representative or to fail to post information as 8required herein constitutes a separate offense. Any such 9employer who fails to keep payroll records as required by this 10Act shall be liable to the Department for a penalty of $100 per 11impacted employee, payable to the Department's Wage Theft 12Enforcement Fund. 13    (a-5) Any employer or his agent, or the officer or agent of 14any private employer who violates any part of subsection (c) 15of Section 4 shall be liable to the Department for a penalty of 16up to $1,500 per day for each violation.17    (b) Any employer or his agent, or the officer or agent of 18any private employer, who pays or agrees to pay to any employee 19wages at a rate less than the rate applicable under this Act or 20of any regulation issued under this Act is guilty of a Class B 21misdemeanor, and each week on any day of which such employee is 22paid less than the wage rate applicable under this Act 23constitutes a separate offense.24    (c) Any employer or his agent, or the officer or agent of 25any private employer, who discharges or in any other manner 26discriminates against any employee because that employee has   HB2982- 11 -LRB104 08468 SPS 18520 b1made a complaint to his employer, or to the Director or his 2authorized representative, that he has not been paid wages in 3accordance with the provisions of this Act, or because that 4employee has caused to be instituted or is about to cause to be 5instituted any proceeding under or related to this Act, or 6because that employee has testified or is about to testify in 7an investigation or proceeding under this Act, is guilty of a 8Class B misdemeanor.9    (d) It is the duty of the Department of Labor to inquire 10diligently for any violations of this Act, and to institute 11the action for penalties herein provided, and to enforce 12generally the provisions of this Act.13(Source: P.A. 101-1, eff. 2-19-19.) 14    Section 10. The Illinois Wage Payment and Collection Act 15is amended by changing Section 4.1 as follows: 16    (820 ILCS 115/4.1)17    Sec. 4.1. Gratuities.18    (a) Gratuities to employees are the property of the 19employees, and employers shall not keep gratuities. Failure to 20pay gratuities owed to an employee more than 13 days after the 21end of the pay period in which such gratuities were earned 22constitutes a violation of this Act.23    (a-5) Any service charge imposed by an employer on a 24customer shall be a gratuity as described in subsection (a)   HB2982- 12 -LRB104 08468 SPS 18520 b1and is the property of the employees. An employer who imposes a 2bona fide service charge on a customer shall explicitly and 3conspicuously disclose to the consumer that all funds 4generated from the service charge are directly given to the 5employees in the form of a gratuity. Nothing in this 6subsection shall be construed to prohibit an otherwise valid 7pooling of gratuities.8    (b) No employer shall withhold This Section does not 9prohibit an employer from withholding from gratuities paid by 10credit card a proportionate amount of any credit card 11processing fees that the employer must pay in connection with 12the transaction, provided that the amount withheld does not 13exceed the proportion of the amount of the tip to the amount of 14the overall bill, regardless of whether the overall bill was 15paid using a credit card. This Section does not prohibit tip 16pooling as permitted by law. This Section does not affect an 17employer's entitlement to an allowance for gratuities to the 18extent permitted under subsection (c) of Section 4 of the 19Minimum Wage Law.20(Source: P.A. 101-509, eff. 1-1-20.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 222025.